Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Chapter 110. Petroleum Inventories; Reporting Requirements

§ 4111.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Public Service or the Commissioner’s designee.

“Petroleum product” means propane, gasoline, unleaded gasoline, kerosene, number two heating oil, diesel fuel, kerosene base jet fuel, and number four, five, and six residual oil for utility and nonutility uses.

“Primary storage facility” or “facility” means any facility or terminal with a capacity of 50,000 gallons or more that receives petroleum products by ship, barge, pipeline, truck, or rail, for holding within the State.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 4, 1980; amended

1983, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 19, 1984.

§ 4112.
Duty of Department of Public Service.

The Commissioner shall collect and keep on file any data required under this chapter from persons owning or leasing primary storage facilities.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 4, 1980; amended

1983, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 19, 1984.

§ 4113.
Inventory reporting; confidentiality.

The Commissioner may adopt rules that require any person owning or leasing primary storage facilities within the State to report to the Commissioner data concerning storage, inventory, and product receipts.

Reports filed pursuant to this section shall be an exempt record and confidential pursuant to

1 V.S.A. § 317(c)(1)

and shall be maintained for the sole and confidential use of the Commissioner, except that the reports may be disclosed to the federal government or to the appropriate energy agency or department of another state with substantially similar confidentiality statutes for regulations with respect to the reports. However, the Commissioner shall make available to appropriate committees of the General Assembly statistical information derived from the reports required by this section, provided that this may be done in a manner that preserves the confidentiality of the reports submitted by particular persons.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 4, 1980; amended

1983, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. April 19, 1984;

2011, No. 59

, § 9;

2015, No. 23

, § 93.

§ 4114.
Remedies; enforcements.

If any person, in violation of the provisions of this chapter, knowingly fails to file a complete and accurate report with the Commissioner, the Commissioner may petition the Superior Court for injunctive relief. Petitions may be filed in the Superior Court of the county in which the defendant resides or, if the defendant is a nonresident, in the Superior Court of any county in which the defendant does business.

A person who, with intent to evade any requirement of this chapter, fails to submit a report when due or to supply required information shall be fined no more than $500.00 or imprisoned not more than 10 days, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 4, 1980; amended

1983, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 19, 1984.

§ 4115.
Liquid heating fuel; heating system change.

Any person who replaces or adapts a liquid fuel heating system so that the liquid fuel is no longer used shall block or otherwise disable the access for delivery of the unused liquid fuel.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 16, 1998.